Utah statutes.
23-21-2.5.   Change in land use where a management plan is not in effect --
Notification to affected persons -- Compatibility with local government plans.
(1)  If a management plan has not been adopted by the division director for a
tract of land owned by the division, the division may not change any existing
right to use the land until the division notifies those who may be affected by
the change and local government officials.
(2)  When changing any existing right to use the land, the division shall seek
to make uses of division-owned land compatible with local government general
plans and zoning and land use ordinances.
